Hawaii statutes.
§397-12 Evidence. No record or
determination of any administrative proceeding under this chapter or any
statement or report of any kind obtained, received, or prepared in connection
with the administration or enforcement of this chapter shall be admitted or
used, whether as evidence or as discovery, in any civil action growing out of
any matter mentioned in the record, determination, statement, or report other
than an action for enforcement or review under this chapter. [L 1980, c 19, pt
of §1; am L 1987, c 44, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next